Tennessee, session 114, HB2465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-501(bb)(2), is amended by
adding the following new subdivisions:
(I) Conspiracy, under § 39-12-103, to commit any of the offenses listed in this
subdivision (bb)(2);
(J) Criminal attempt, under § 39-12-101, to commit any of the offenses listed in
this subdivision (bb)(2); and
(K) Solicitation, under § 39-12-102, to commit any of the offenses listed in this
subdivision (bb)(2).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-501(cc)(2), is amended by
adding the following new subdivisions:
(R) Conspiracy, under § 39-12-103, to commit any of the offenses listed in this
subdivision (cc)(2);
(S) Criminal attempt, under § 39-12-101, to commit any of the offenses listed in
this subdivision (cc)(2); and
(T) Solicitation, under § 39-12-102, to commit any of the offenses listed in this
subdivision (cc)(2).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
HB2465
010889
- 1 -